Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.130

Intent—Local infrastructure assistance—Plan.

(1) The legislature intends to modernize state programs that provide financial and technical assistance related to local infrastructure by: (a) Clarifying the policy objectives and priorities for state assistance for local infrastructure; (b) eliminating redundancy among the various state programs; (c) increasing the speed of delivering state assistance and the ability to respond to emerging needs; (d) maximizing the acquisition and use of federal funding sources; (e) ensuring transparency in state and federal assistance; (f) improving access to the lowest cost private market financing; and (g) ensuring accountability and the periodic review of progress.

(2) By November 1, 2011, the public works board must prepare and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature an implementation plan for creating a reformed state system for providing local infrastructure assistance. In developing the plan, the board must consult with state agencies that provide infrastructure funding and technical assistance including, but not limited to, the departments of commerce, health, and ecology. The board must also work in cooperation with local governments or entities that benefit from infrastructure funding and technical assistance.

(3) The board, state agencies, and local partners must consider, among other things, consolidation of state appropriations to support policy-focused investments including water quality, safe drinking water, stormwater, economic development, access to private financing, solid waste and recycling, and flood levees. In addition, they must consider consolidating assistance packages, streamlining application processes, and clarify the respective responsibilities of state and local agencies in planning for, developing[,] and maintaining local public infrastructure.

(4) The implementation plan must include draft legislation and the organizational and budgetary changes necessary to implement the new system in time for the 2013-2015 budget cycle.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7028.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 48: See note following RCW 39.35B.050.